SpellChecking/Dictionaries/sorbian.aff
FLAG num
SFX 0282 Y 11
SFX 0282 a ach .
SFX 0282 a am .
SFX 0282 a ej .
SFX 0282 a emi .
SFX 0282 a o .
SFX 0282 a ojo .
SFX 0282 a om .
SFX 0282 a omaj .
SFX 0282 a ona .
SFX 0282 a ow .
SFX 0282 a u .

SFX 0283 Y 7
SFX 0283 e ach .
SFX 0283 e am .
SFX 0283 e ami .
SFX 0283 e omaj .
SFX 0283 e ow .
SFX 0283 e u .
SFX 0283 e y .

SFX 0284 Y 8
SFX 0284 e ach .
SFX 0284 e am .
SFX 0284 e ami .
SFX 0284 e ey .
SFX 0284 e omaj .
SFX 0284 e ow .
SFX 0284 e u .
SFX 0284 e y .

SFX 0285 Y 11
SFX 0285 a ach .
SFX 0285 a aj .
SFX 0285 a am .
SFX 0285 a ami .
SFX 0285 a ej .
SFX 0285 a i .
SFX 0285 a o .
SFX 0285 a om .
SFX 0285 a omaj .
SFX 0285 a ow .
SFX 0285 a u .

SFX 0286 Y 11
SFX 0286 er ra ..
SFX 0286 er rach ..
SFX 0286 er ram ..
SFX 0286 er re ..
SFX 0286 er rej ..
SFX 0286 er remi ..
SFX 0286 er ro ..
SFX 0286 er rom ..
SFX 0286 er romaj ..
SFX 0286 er row ..
SFX 0286 er ru ..

SFX 0287 Y 5
SFX 0287 i ijach .
SFX 0287 i ijam .
SFX 0287 i ije .
SFX 0287 i ijemi .
SFX 0287 i ijow .

SFX 0288 Y 13
SFX 0288 er ra ..
SFX 0288 er rach ..
SFX 0288 er raj ..
SFX 0288 er ram ..
SFX 0288 er rami ..
SFX 0288 er rej ..
SFX 0288 er rje ..
SFX 0288 er ro ..
SFX 0288 er rojo ..
SFX 0288 er rom ..
SFX 0288 er romaj ..
SFX 0288 er row ..
SFX 0288 er ru ..

SFX 0289 Y 6
SFX 0289 a i .
SFX 0289 a je .
SFX 0289 a o .
SFX 0289 a om .
SFX 0289 a omu .
SFX 0289 a u .

SFX 0290 Y 10
SFX 0290 a ach .
SFX 0290 a aj .
SFX 0290 a am .
SFX 0290 a ami .
SFX 0290 a ej .
SFX 0290 a je .
SFX 0290 a o .
SFX 0290 a om .
SFX 0290 a omaj .
SFX 0290 a ow .

SFX 0291 Y 8
SFX 0291 u ach .
SFX 0291 u am .
SFX 0291 u ami .
SFX 0291 u je .
SFX 0291 u omaj .
SFX 0291 u ow .
SFX 0291 u y .
SFX 0291 u yje .

SFX 0292 Y 12
SFX 0292 še cha ..
SFX 0292 še chach ..
SFX 0292 še chaj ..
SFX 0292 še cham ..
SFX 0292 še chami ..
SFX 0292 še chej ..
SFX 0292 še cho ..
SFX 0292 še chojo ..
SFX 0292 še chom ..
SFX 0292 še chomaj ..
SFX 0292 še chow ..
SFX 0292 še chu ..

SFX 0293 Y 9
SFX 0293 ha hach ..
SFX 0293 ha ham ..
SFX 0293 ha hami ..
SFX 0293 ha he ..
SFX 0293 ha hi ..
SFX 0293 ha homaj ..
SFX 0293 ha how ..
SFX 0293 ha hu ..
SFX 0293 ha ze ..

SFX 0294 Y 11
SFX 0294 ta tach ..
SFX 0294 ta taj ..
SFX 0294 ta tam ..
SFX 0294 ta tami ..
SFX 0294 ta tej ..
SFX 0294 ta to ..
SFX 0294 ta tom ..
SFX 0294 ta tomaj ..
SFX 0294 ta tow ..
SFX 0294 ta ty ..
SFX 0294 ta će ..

SFX 0295 Y 12
SFX 0295 ir ira ..
SFX 0295 ir iro ..
SFX 0295 ir rach ..
SFX 0295 ir ram ..
SFX 0295 ir re ..
SFX 0295 ir rej ..
SFX 0295 ir remi ..
SFX 0295 ir ro ..
SFX 0295 ir rom ..
SFX 0295 ir romaj ..
SFX 0295 ir row ..
SFX 0295 ir ru ..

SFX 0296 Y 11
SFX 0296 a ach .
SFX 0296 a am .
SFX 0296 a e .
SFX 0296 a ej .
SFX 0296 a emi .
SFX 0296 a o .
SFX 0296 a ojo .
SFX 0296 a om .
SFX 0296 a omaj .
SFX 0296 a ow .
SFX 0296 a u .

SFX 0297 Y 9
SFX 0297 a ach .
SFX 0297 a am .
SFX 0297 a e .
SFX 0297 a ej .
SFX 0297 a emi .
SFX 0297 a i .
SFX 0297 a omaj .
SFX 0297 a ow .
SFX 0297 a u .

SFX 0298 Y 8
SFX 0298 ha hach ..
SFX 0298 ha ham ..
SFX 0298 ha hami ..
SFX 0298 ha homaj ..
SFX 0298 ha how ..
SFX 0298 ha hu ..
SFX 0298 ha hy ..
SFX 0298 ha ze ..

SFX 0299 Y 13
SFX 0299 a ach .
SFX 0299 a aj .
SFX 0299 a am .
SFX 0299 a ami .
SFX 0299 a e .
SFX 0299 a ej .
SFX 0299 a o .
SFX 0299 a om .
SFX 0299 a omaj .
SFX 0299 a ow .
SFX 0299 a u .
SFX 0299 a y .
SFX 0299 a źe .

SFX 0300 Y 12
SFX 0300 y ja .
SFX 0300 y jach .
SFX 0300 y jam .
SFX 0300 y je .
SFX 0300 y jej .
SFX 0300 y jemi .
SFX 0300 y jo .
SFX 0300 y jom .
SFX 0300 y jomaj .
SFX 0300 y jow .
SFX 0300 y ju .
SFX 0300 y yja .

SFX 0301 Y 13
SFX 0301 ót ota ..
SFX 0301 ót otach ..
SFX 0301 ót otaj ..
SFX 0301 ót otam ..
SFX 0301 ót otami ..
SFX 0301 ót otej ..
SFX 0301 ót oto ..
SFX 0301 ót otom ..
SFX 0301 ót otomaj ..
SFX 0301 ót otow ..
SFX 0301 ót otu ..
SFX 0301 ót oty ..
SFX 0301 ót oće ..

SFX 0302 Y 9
SFX 0302 a ach .
SFX 0302 a am .
SFX 0302 a e .
SFX 0302 a emi .
SFX 0302 a i .
SFX 0302 a je .
SFX 0302 a omaj .
SFX 0302 a ow .
SFX 0302 a u .

SFX 0303 Y 8
SFX 0303 g gach .
SFX 0303 g gam .
SFX 0303 g gami .
SFX 0303 g gi .
SFX 0303 g gomaj .
SFX 0303 g gow .
SFX 0303 g gu .
SFX 0303 g ze .

SFX 0304 Y 30
SFX 0304 š syli .
SFX 0304 š symoj .
SFX 0304 š symy .
SFX 0304 š sytaj .
SFX 0304 š sytej .
SFX 0304 š syć .
SFX 0304 š syće .
SFX 0304 š sył .
SFX 0304 š syła .
SFX 0304 š syło .
SFX 0304 š syłoj .
SFX 0304 š syš .
SFX 0304 š yć .
SFX 0304 š ša .
SFX 0304 š šach .
SFX 0304 š šachmoj .
SFX 0304 š šachmy .
SFX 0304 š šachu .
SFX 0304 š šacy .
SFX 0304 š šenje .
SFX 0304 š šeny .
SFX 0304 š šeše .
SFX 0304 š šeštaj .
SFX 0304 š šeštej .
SFX 0304 š šešće .
SFX 0304 š šmy .
SFX 0304 š štaj .
SFX 0304 š štej .
SFX 0304 š šu .
SFX 0304 š šće .

SFX 0305 Y 13
SFX 0305 cy ka ..
SFX 0305 cy kach ..
SFX 0305 cy kaj ..
SFX 0305 cy kam ..
SFX 0305 cy kami ..
SFX 0305 cy keho ..
SFX 0305 cy kej ..
SFX 0305 cy ki ..
SFX 0305 cy ko ..
SFX 0305 cy kom ..
SFX 0305 cy komaj ..
SFX 0305 cy kow ..
SFX 0305 cy ku ..

SFX 0306 Y 14
SFX 0306 er era ..
SFX 0306 er ra ..
SFX 0306 er rach ..
SFX 0306 er raj ..
SFX 0306 er ram ..
SFX 0306 er rami ..
SFX 0306 er rej ..
SFX 0306 er rje ..
SFX 0306 er ro ..
SFX 0306 er rom ..
SFX 0306 er romaj ..
SFX 0306 er row ..
SFX 0306 er ru ..
SFX 0306 er ry ..

SFX 0307 Y 36
SFX 0307 hić ducy ...
SFX 0307 hić hiće ...
SFX 0307 hić póńdu ...
SFX 0307 hić póńdźe ...
SFX 0307 hić póńdźemoj ...
SFX 0307 hić póńdźemy ...
SFX 0307 hić póńdźetaj ...
SFX 0307 hić póńdźetej ...
SFX 0307 hić póńdźeće ...
SFX 0307 hić póńdźeš ...
SFX 0307 hić ńdu ...
SFX 0307 hić ńdź ...
SFX 0307 hić ńdźe ...
SFX 0307 hić ńdźech ...
SFX 0307 hić ńdźechmoj ...
SFX 0307 hić ńdźechmy ...
SFX 0307 hić ńdźechu ...
SFX 0307 hić ńdźemoj ...
SFX 0307 hić ńdźemy ...
SFX 0307 hić ńdźetaj ...
SFX 0307 hić ńdźetej ...
SFX 0307 hić ńdźeće ...
SFX 0307 hić ńdźeš ...
SFX 0307 hić ńdźeše ...
SFX 0307 hić ńdźeštaj ...
SFX 0307 hić ńdźeštej ...
SFX 0307 hić ńdźešće ...
SFX 0307 hić ńdźtaj ...
SFX 0307 hić ńdźtej ...
SFX 0307 hić ńdźće ...
SFX 0307 hić šli ...
SFX 0307 hić šoł ...
SFX 0307 hić šła ...
SFX 0307 hić šłe ...
SFX 0307 hić šło ...
SFX 0307 hić šłoj ...

SFX 0308 Y 6
SFX 0308 a ach .
SFX 0308 a am .
SFX 0308 a e .
SFX 0308 a omaj .
SFX 0308 a ow .
SFX 0308 a u .

SFX 0309 Y 12
SFX 0309 ós osa ..
SFX 0309 ós osach ..
SFX 0309 ós osaj ..
SFX 0309 ós osam ..
SFX 0309 ós osami ..
SFX 0309 ós osej ..
SFX 0309 ós oso ..
SFX 0309 ós osom ..
SFX 0309 ós osomaj ..
SFX 0309 ós osow ..
SFX 0309 ós osu ..
SFX 0309 ós osy ..

SFX 0310 Y 30
SFX 0310 ćěr hnali ...
SFX 0310 ćěr hnaty ...
SFX 0310 ćěr hnać ...
SFX 0310 ćěr hnaće ...
SFX 0310 ćěr hnał ...
SFX 0310 ćěr hnała ...
SFX 0310 ćěr hnałe ...
SFX 0310 ćěr hnało ...
SFX 0310 ćěr hnałoj ...
SFX 0310 ćěr ćěri ...
SFX 0310 ćěr ćěrimoj ...
SFX 0310 ćěr ćěrimy ...
SFX 0310 ćěr ćěritaj ...
SFX 0310 ćěr ćěritej ...
SFX 0310 ćěr ćěriće ...
SFX 0310 ćěr ćěriš ...
SFX 0310 ćěr ćěrja ...
SFX 0310 ćěr ćěrjach ...
SFX 0310 ćěr ćěrjachmoj ...
SFX 0310 ćěr ćěrjachmy ...
SFX 0310 ćěr ćěrjachu ...
SFX 0310 ćěr ćěrjacy ...
SFX 0310 ćěr ćěrješe ...
SFX 0310 ćěr ćěrještaj ...
SFX 0310 ćěr ćěrještej ...
SFX 0310 ćěr ćěrješće ...
SFX 0310 ćěr ćěrju ...
SFX 0310 ćěr ćěrtaj ...
SFX 0310 ćěr ćěrtej ...
SFX 0310 ćěr ćěrće ...

SFX 0311 Y 4
SFX 0311 y ach .
SFX 0311 y am .
SFX 0311 y ami .
SFX 0311 y źoch .

SFX 0312 Y 19
SFX 0312 a aj .
SFX 0312 a e .
SFX 0312 a eho .
SFX 0312 a ej .
SFX 0312 a eje .
SFX 0312 a eju .
SFX 0312 a emu .
SFX 0312 a oh .
SFX 0312 a om .
SFX 0312 a u .
SFX 0312 a y .
SFX 0312 a ych .
SFX 0312 a ym .
SFX 0312 a ymaj .
SFX 0312 a ymi .
SFX 0312 a źe .
SFX 0312 a źi .
SFX 0312 a źiši .
SFX 0312 a źišo .

SFX 0313 Y 10
SFX 0313 ósć osća ...
SFX 0313 ósć osćej ...
SFX 0313 ósć osći ...
SFX 0313 ósć osćimi ...
SFX 0313 ósć osćo ...
SFX 0313 ósć osćoch ...
SFX 0313 ósć osćom ...
SFX 0313 ósć osćomaj ...
SFX 0313 ósć osćow ...
SFX 0313 ósć osću ...
