SpellChecking/Dictionaries/sorbian.dic
Fidźi/0287
Gotha/0298
Hebrejscy/0305
Himalaja/0308
Konga/0290
Marseillaise/0283
Marseillaise/0284
Pluta/0294
Provence/0283
Provence/0284
Shakespeara/0296
Wartburg/0303
charmeuse/0283
charmeuse/0284
faraa/0282
fayence/0283
fayence/0284
fiaska/0285
fiber/0286
filister/0288
fortissima/0289
freska/0285
galwana/0290
gangwau/0291
gauše/0292
gefrajter/0288
geisha/0293
geta/0294
ginkga/0290
gir/0295
gondoliera/0296
gorila/0297
granda/0299
grizzly/0300
grót/0301
guana/0290
guanaka/0285
guerilla/0302
guppy/0300
halig/0303
haš/0304
helikopter/0306
heling/0303
hober/0288
hody/0311
horda/0312
hypochonder/0288
hósć/0313
hłós/0309
indiga/0290
inferna/0290
juru/0291
kalika/0285
kamjeńtwjerda/0312
karabiniera/0296
kazina/0290
kimona/0290
krater/0306
kucharscy/0305
kwartěrmišter/0288
kós/0309
kóžda/0312
kłós/0309
lobbu/0291
lota/0294
mandźelscy/0305
manka/0285
merina/0290
mimikru/0291
minister/0288
mišter/0288
motorscy/0305
munga/0290
muscy/0305
młynscy/0305
naduwata/0294
neutrina/0290
njehić/0307
njećěr/0310
nós/0309
pater/0288
piana/0290
pianina/0290
pjekarscy/0305
porna/0290
premierminister/0288
psalter/0306
psychiater/0288
pót/0301
płót/0301
přetwjerda/0312
ressource/0283
rewolwer/0306
rizika/0285
rjemjeslniscy/0305
rokoka/0285
rozhłós/0309
rězniscy/0305
saka/0285
shopping-center/0286
skót/0301
sliper/0306
storna/0290
stražmišter/0288
syder/0286
tanga/0290
torsa/0285
tota/0294
twjerda/0312
wertika/0285
weta/0294
wicemišter/0288
wobnós/0309
wothłós/0309
wrjós/0309
wulkomišter/0288
włós/0309
łós/0309
škleńcotwjerda/0312
